src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, ī (->) Ī, ū (->) Ū,
ē (->) Ē, ä (->) Ä, ā (->) Ā, ǟ (->) Ǟ, ȯ (->) Ȯ, ļ (->) Ļ, ņ (->) Ņ,
ţ (->) Ţ, š (->) Š, ž (->) Ž, ŗ (->) Ŗ, ü (->) Ü, ǖ (->) Ǖ,ö (->) Ö,
̄ō (->) Ō, õ (->) Õ || .#. _ ;
